Massachusetts, session 194th, S142.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
"Bias-free" to review a case file without the following identifying demographic
information on the parent and child: gender, race, ethnicity, disability, geographic location, and
socioeconomic status, which prevents a reader from inserting bias, implicit or explicit, into
critical decisions such as removing a child from the child's family.
(a) The Department of Children and Families shall develop a permanent Bias-Free Case
Review Team for each Area Office, consisting of no less than three staff, to screen all proposed
emergency child removals under section 51B chapter 119 of the General Laws. The department
of 3

shall develop a bias-free case summary which removes all demographics and identifying
information, and presents evidence of safety factors that place the child(ren) in immediate or
impending danger of serious harm, the family’s strengths, and opportunities for supportive
interventions prior to removal. Prior to the Review Team convening, the following demographic
and identifiable information must be removed from the case notes, intake summary, and
investigation:
(i) The name of the child and the child's parents.
(ii) The race or ethnicity of the child and the child's parents, except when the allegations
require thoughtful considerations pertaining to a family's culture, ethnicity, or religion.
(iii) The sexual orientation or gender identity of the child and the child's parents, except
when the allegations require thoughtful considerations pertaining to the LGBTQ+ status or
gender identity of the child.
(iv) The religious affiliation or beliefs of the child and the child's parents, except when
the allegations require thoughtful considerations pertaining to a family's culture, ethnicity, or
religion.
(v) The disability status of a parent, except when the allegations require thoughtful
considerations pertaining to a family's disability status.
(vi) The political affiliation or beliefs of the child and the child's parents.
(vii) The marital status of the child's parents.
(viii) The income level of the child's parents.
of 3

(ix) The education level of the child's parents.
(x) Any reference to the location of the neighborhood or county of the parent's address.
(b) The Department of Children and Families shall develop a training for staff of Bias-
Free Case Review Team in each area office. That shall be completed by the staff no less than
annually.
(c) The Department of Children and Families shall submit an annual evaluation report to
the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities that details the program's
implementation and that provides an analysis of the program's effect and impact on the removal
rates of black, indigenous and children of color.
of 3